New York, session 2025-2026, A1468.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 573 of the public health law, as 2 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public health law 3 relating to certificates of qualification for clinical laboratories and 4 blood banks, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8966-A and A. 5 9235-A, is amended to read as follows: 6 1. The department shall issue a certificate of qualification to any 7 person who meets [prescribed] minimum qualifications [under], prescribed 8 by the department and in accordance with federal regulations, including 9 board certification as required, and who otherwise demonstrates to the 10 department that such person possesses the character, competence, train- 11 ing and ability to administer properly the technical and scientific 12 operation of a clinical laboratory or blood bank, including supervision 13 of procedures and reporting of findings of tests. 14 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 5 of section 225 of the public 15 health law, as amended by chapter 571 of the laws of 1976, is amended to 16 read as follows: 17 (b) prescribe the qualifications of public health personnel of the 18 department, directors of divisions, regional health directors, state 19 district health officers, local health officers; [directors or other 20 persons in charge of laboratories;] county and city health commission- 21 ers, deputy and assistant county or city health commissioners; public 22 health administrators; county health directors and deputy and assistant 23 county health directors; directors of county physically handicapped 24 children's programs; directors of medical care (local assistance 25 programs); public health nurses; public health physical therapists; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02906-01-5 A. 1468 2 1 public health educators; nurse-midwives; medical social workers; public 2 health social workers; radiation safety officers; sanitary and public 3 health engineers, sanitarians, sanitary inspectors; public health veter- 4 inarians; operators of public water treatment and purification plants; 5 and the qualifications of persons not paid from public funds and who are 6 appointed and employed after January first, nineteen hundred forty-sev- 7 en, as operators of water treatment or purification plants owned or 8 operated by water companies, corporations or by a person or group of 9 persons serving the general public residing in a political subdivision 10 or any part thereof; 11 § 3. This act shall take effect on the same date in the same manner as 12 a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public health law relating to 13 certificates of qualification for clinical laboratories and blood banks, 14 as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8966-A and A. 9235-A, takes 15 effect.